Illinois, session 104th, HB3092.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by adding Section 52-3.206 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/2-3.206 new)7    Sec. 2-3.206. Employing manufacturing employees. Subject 8to appropriation, the State Board of Education shall pay 9one-half of the salary of an employee that is employed by a 10manufacturing company and working within a school district at 11a high school as a licensed career and technical education 12teacher.